Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-210 Advertising prohibited.
(a) No publication published in this State, or radio or television
broadcaster, or any other agency or means for the dissemination of information
operated or located in this State shall publish, broadcast, or otherwise
disseminate within this State, advertising for or on behalf of any insurer not
then authorized to transact insurance in this State.

(b) This section does not apply to
publications published in this State principally for circulation in the
continental United States, wherein advertising by or on behalf of an
unauthorized insurer is not directed expressly toward residents or subjects of
insurance in this State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next